HunSpellDictionaries/bg_BG.dic
безпокоя/V
благоустроя/V
ближа/W
боя/KV
броя/V
бръмча/V
буча/PV
вгорча/V
вея/W
влея/W
всея/W
възпея/W
вържа/W
гноя/V
горча/V
гоя/V
гълча/V
гъмжа/V
двоя/V
доближа/PW
доброя/V
довържа/W
доизкажа/W
доизлежа/V
доизлея/W
доизпея/W
докажа/W
долея/W
домажа/W
донижа/W
допея/W
доразкажа/W
досея/W
достроя/V
дотежа/V
дотърча/V
доугоя/V
доя/V
дружа/PV
дрънча/V
дължа/V
еча/V
жалея/W
жужа/V
забръмча/V
забуча/PV
завея/W
завържа/W
загноя/V
загоя/V
задоя/V
задрънча/V
задължа/PV
зазвуча/V
закажа/W
заквича/V
залежа/V
залея/W
залижа/W
залоя/V
замажа/W
замижа/V
замълча/V
занижа/W
запея/W
запоя/V
заприкажа/W
зарея/W
зароя/V
заръмжа/V
засвоя/V
засея/W
застроя/V
затая/V
затърча/V
зафуча/V
захвърча/V
звуча/V
зея/W
изближа/W
изброя/V
избръмча/V
избуча/V
извея/W
извържа/W
издоя/V
издрънча/V
издължа/V
изеча/V
изкажа/W
изквича/V
излежа/V
излея/W
излижа/W
измажа/W
измуча/V
изнижа/W
изпея/W
изприкажа/W
изроя/V
изруча/V
изръмжа/V
изтърча/V
изфуча/V
изхвърча/V
кажа/W
каканижа/W
квича/V
клеча/V
кроя/V
лежа/V
лея/W
лижа/W
лича/V
мажа/W
мижа/V
миропомажа/W
множа/V
муча/V
мълча/V
наброя/V
навея/W
навържа/W
нагноя/V
нагорча/V
нагоя/V
нагълча/V
надоя/V
надпея/W
надстроя/V
нажежа/V
наивнича/V
накажа/W
належа/V
налея/W
налижа/W
намажа/W
намножа/V
нанижа/W
напея/W
наполея/W
напоя/V
нароя/V
насея/W
наслоя/V
настроя/V
натежа/V
нижа/W
обвея/W
обвържа/W
обезпокоя/V
оближа/W
обнажа/W
обосея/W
овея/W
овържа/W
озвуча/V
окажа/W
олея/W
олижа/W
омажа/W
опея/W
опросея/W
осея/W
отброя/V
отвея/W
отвържа/W
отзвуча/V
откажа/W
откроя/V
отлежа/V
отпея/W
отпоя/V
отсея/W
отърча/V
пея/W
поближа/W
побоя/V
повея/W
подвея/W
подвържа/W
подлежа/V
подлея/W
подлижа/W
подмажа/W
подоя/V
подсея/W
подскажа/W
позавържа/W
позамажа/W
позапея/W
позасея/W
поизкажа/W
поизлежа/V
поизлея/W
поизлижа/W
поизмажа/W
поизпея/W
покажа/W
покроя/V
полежа/V
полея/W
полижа/W
помажа/W
помълча/V
понаближа/PV
понавържа/W
понагоя/V
понажежа/V
понакажа/W
поналея/W
понамажа/W
понапоя/V
понасея/W
понатежа/V
понижа/PW
поотвея/W
пооткажа/W
поотсея/W
попея/W
попрелея/W
попресея/W
попривържа/W
поприкажа/W
поразвея/W
поразвържа/W
поразлея/W
поразпея/W
поразприкажа/W
поразсея/W
посея/W
поскроя/V
построя/V
потая/V
поуспокоя/V
поя/V
преброя/V
превея/W
превържа/W
предскажа/W
прекроя/V
прелея/W
премажа/W
премижа/V
премълча/V
препея/W
преразкажа/W
пресея/W
престроя/V
преуспея/W
преустроя/V
префуча/V
прехвърча/V
привържа/W
прилея/W
примажа/W
примижа/V
принадлежа/V
припея/W
присвоя/V
пристроя/V
притая/V
притърча/V
провея/W
продължа/V
проеча/V
прозвуча/V
пролея/W
пролича/V
пронижа/W
пропея/W
просея/W
противореча/V
профуча/V
развея/W
развържа/W
раздвоя/V
раздрънча/V
разкажа/W
разкроя/V
разлея/W
размажа/W
размножа/V
разнижа/W
разпея/W
разпоя/V
разсея/W
разслоя/V
разстроя/V
разфуча/V
разхвърча/V
рея/W
роя/V
руча/V
ръмжа/V
самоуспокоя/V
свържа/W
сгълча/V
сея/W
скроя/V
слея/W
слоя/V
смажа/W
смълча/V
сплетнича/V
спотая/V
споя/V
стая/KV
строя/V
струя/KV
стърча/V
съучастнича/V
тая/V
тежа/V
трудоустроя/V
търча/V
увържа/W
угоя/V
удвоя/V
удължа/V
укажа/W
умножа/V
умълча/V
упокоя/V
упоя/V
усвоя/V
успея/W
успокоя/V
устроя/V
утая/V
фуча/V
харижа/W
хвърча/V
цвърча/V
